Georgia, session 2025_26, HB229.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 48-8-3 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to exemptions from
sales and use taxes, is amended by adding a new paragraph to read as follows:
"(10.1)(A) Notwithstanding any provision of Code Section 48-8-63 to the contrary, the
sale or use of qualifying construction materials used in capital outlay projects for
educational purposes.
H. B. 229 (SUB)
- 1 -

LC 50 1158S
(B) The exemption provided for in this paragraph shall only apply to local sales and
use taxes.
(C)(i) Notwithstanding the exemption provided for in subparagraph (A) of this
paragraph, all sales and use taxes imposed on the sale or use of qualifying
construction materials shall be paid and collected pursuant to the requirements of this
chapter.
(ii) The benefit of the exemption allowed by this paragraph may be claimed by the
local school system for which the qualifying construction materials were used. To
claim the exemption, the local school system shall file a request for refund in the
manner prescribed by the department. The department shall refund to the local school
system the amount of taxes paid on qualifying construction materials used in the
capital outlay project for educational purposes. No refund made pursuant to this
paragraph shall include interest.
(iii) Any refund received by a local school system pursuant to this paragraph shall be
allocated to a fund or account for capital outlay projects and used in accordance with
the requirements for sales taxes for educational purposes authorized pursuant to
Article VIII, Section VI, Paragraph IV of the Constitution of Georgia.
(D) As used in this paragraph, the term:
(i) 'Capital outlay project for educational purposes' means a project that:
(I) Was approved and funded through a sales tax for educational purposes
authorized pursuant to Article VIII, Section VI, Paragraph IV of the Constitution of
Georgia; and
(II) Is for a local school system which has in effect a base year value or adjusted
base year value homestead exemption from ad valorem taxation for educational
purposes for all residents of the local school system.
(ii) 'Local sales and use taxes' mean sales taxes, use taxes, or local sales and use taxes
levied or imposed at any time in any area consisting of less than the entire state,
H. B. 229 (SUB)
- 2 -

LC 50 1158S
however authorized, including, but not limited to, such taxes authorized by or
pursuant to a constitutional amendment; by or pursuant to Section 25 of an Act
approved March 10, 1965 (Ga. L. 1965, p. 2243), as amended, the 'Metropolitan
Atlanta Rapid Transit Authority Act of 1965'; and by or pursuant to Articles 2, 2A,
2B, 3, 4, 5, 5A, and 5B of this chapter.
(iii) 'Qualifying construction materials' means any materials used in the construction
of a capital outlay project for educational purposes that will remain as part of such
project after completion of construction or that become incorporated into such
project's real property. Such term shall not include any materials that remain in the
possession of a contractor after the completion of construction.
(E) This paragraph shall stand repealed on December 31, 2033;"
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 229 (SUB)
- 3 -